Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 3. County Road Accountant.

§ 65-17-101.
Supervisors may elect road accountant.

The board of supervisors may elect a road accountant, whose salary shall be fixed by the board and who shall give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). For the purpose of enabling the road accountant, in counties working their roads and building and repairing bridges on the unit system or countywide basis, to meet weekly payrolls and to pay for same each week or biweekly, the board of supervisors may advance to him at each regular monthly meeting, out of the road and bridge fund of the county, a sum not exceeding fifty percent (50%) of the amount of his bond. Said road accountant shall place said funds in the county depository to his credit as road accountant, to be checked on by him to meet weekly payrolls for labor, and said fund shall be a public fund and shall be secured as other public funds are secured. The road accountant shall report to the next meeting of the board his disposition of said money, including an itemized payroll for same, which payroll must be approved by the board of supervisors before another advance to him may be made. In the event the board finds any discrepancies in said payroll account, he shall be liable on his official bond for same; and the board of supervisors, in such event, shall not make further allowances to him until said discrepancies are corrected. It shall be the duty of the road accountant to pay all labor employed on the road and bridge work of the county, to pay transportation charges on supplies and material used in such road and bridge work, and all bills for repairs. Every three (3) months he shall take an inventory of all the personal property of the county used in said road and bridge work.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259c; 1930, § 6401; 1942, § 8349; Laws, 1920, ch. 266; Laws, 1936, ch. 306; Laws, 1946, ch. 316; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 45; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-17-103.
Estimates and reports.

The road accountant shall attend all meetings of the board of supervisors, and shall at each regular meeting submit to said board an estimate of the amount of money required to pay the said labor employed on the said road and bridge work, transportation charges, and repair bills. Said board shall examine said estimate and shall set aside for the current month a fund to be known as the “road labor” fund, which sum shall be placed to the credit of the said fund in the county depository, subject to the order of the road accountant; and said road accountant shall use the said fund to pay off the said labor and all freight bills. At each regular meeting of the board of supervisors the road accountant shall make a report to the said board, showing all disbursements by him and proper receipts therefor. The board of supervisors shall carefully audit the said report, and if they shall find any payment or payments or any disbursements so made by the road accountant to be illegal or improper, said board may deduct any and all such payments from the salary of the road accountant, or they may cause suit to be filed on his bond for the recovery of any such sum so illegally or improperly paid out by the road accountant.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259d; 1930, § 7402; 1942, § 8350; Laws, 1920, ch. 266.

§ 65-17-105.
Accountant to be purchasing agent.

The road accountant shall be the purchasing agent of the county and, by and with the consent of the board of supervisors, shall purchase all materials, implements, and supplies used in such road and bridge work.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259e; 1930, § 6403; 1942, § 8351; Laws, 1920, ch. 266.

§ 65-17-107.
Accountant to submit trial balance.

The road accountant shall keep a complete set of books, showing in detail all receipts and disbursements had or made by him. With every report made by him to the board of supervisors as hereinbefore required, he shall submit a trial balance of the said books, showing in detail all his transactions as such road accountant.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259f; 1930, § 6404; 1942, § 8352; Laws, 1920, ch. 266.